src/itj-lex.txt
! INTERJECTIONS
! EUD 2011
! FILLED PAUSES (CHILDES term)
! COMMUNICATORS (CHILDES term)
! SIMPLE EVENTS (CHILDES term)
! Unknown/unintelligible/inaudible


Multichar_Symbols

+Itj		!  Interjection
+Filler		!  Filled Pause (eh, em,
+Cmc		!  Communicator (yeah, y'know)
+Event		!  Simple Event (laugh, sneeze etc.)
+Xxx		!  Indecipherable speech	

LEXICON Root
	Interjections;
	Fillers;
	Communicators;
	Events;

LEXICON Interjections
xxx+Xxx:xxx			#;

á+Itj:á				#;
áh+Itj:áh			#;	!!! Hartmann
abú+Itj:abú			#;
áiméan+Itj:áiméan		#;
ambaiste+Itj:ambaiste	#;
ara+Itj:ara			#;
bhuel+Itj:bhuel			#;
bhail+Itj:bhail			#;
bhoil+Itj:bhoil			#;	!!! Hartmann
faraor+Itj:faraor		#;
hurá+Itj:hurá			#;
leoga+Itj:leoga			#;
monuar+Itj:monuar		#;
muise+Itj:muise			#;
ó+Itj:ó				#;
óh+Itj:óh			#;	!!! Hartmann
och+Itj:och			#;
ochón+Itj:ochón			#;
oró+Itj:oró			#;
heileo+Itj:Heileo		#;
haló+Itj:Haló			#;

! FILLED PAUSES
LEXICON Fillers	

ah+Filler:ah			#;	!!!  GALA
oh+Filler:oh			#;	!!!  GALA
aha+Filler:aha			#;	!!!  GALA
eh+Filler:eh			#;	!!!  GALA
em+Filler:em			#;	!!!  GALA
um+Filler:um			#;	!!!  GALA
mm+Filler:mm			#;	!!!  GALA
hm+Filler:hm			#;	!!!  GALA
mhm+Filler:mhm			#;	!!!  GALA
uhuh+Filler:uhuh		#;	!!!  GALA
uhoh+Filler:uhoh		#;	!!!  GALA
uh+Filler:uh			#;	!!!  GALA

LEXICON Communicators
an_dtuigeann_tú+Cmc:an_dtuigeann_tú	#;
<m a r %_:%  a %_:%  d é a r f á %+Cmc:0>	#;
<f a i r  %_:%  p l a y %+Cmc:0>		#;
<k n o w %_:%  w h a t %_:%  I %_:%  m e a n %+Cmc:0>	#;
<I %_:%  m e a n %+Cmc:0>		#;
<I %_:%  s u p p o s e %+Cmc:0>		#;
<y o u %_:%  k n o w %+Cmc:0>		#;

anyway+Cmc:anyway			#;
anyways+Cmc:anyways			#;
aye+Cmc:aye				#;
but+Cmc:but				#;
bydad+Cmc:bydad				#;
lovely+Cmc:lovely			#;
just+Cmc:just				#;
now+Cmc:now				#;
ok+Cmc:ok				#;
since+Cmc:since				#;
so+Cmc:so@eng				#;
yeah+Cmc:yeah				#;
well+Cmc:well				#;


LEXICON Events
@=broim+Event:@=broim			#; ! fart
@=brúcht+Event:@=brúcht			#; ! belch
@=caoineadh+Event:@=caoineadh		#; ! cry
@=casacht+Event:@=casacht		#; ! cough
@=gáire+Event:@=gáire			#; ! laugh
@=fuaim+Event:@=fuaim			#; ! other sound
@=méanfach+Event:@=méanfach		#; ! yawn
@=sraoth+Event:@=sraoth			#; ! sneeze
@=clic+Event:@=clic			#; ! click
